Illinois, session 104th, HB2946.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Family 5and Medical Leave Insurance Act. 6    Section 5. Declaration of policy and intent. Many workers 7do not have access to family and medical leave programs, those 8who do may not be in a financial position to take family or 9medical leave that is unpaid, and employer-paid benefits meet 10only a relatively small part of this need. It is the public 11policy of this State to protect working individuals and their 12families against the economic hardship caused by the need to 13take time off from work to care for themselves or family 14members who are suffering from a serious illness, for a 15newborn or a newly adopted or foster child, for pregnancy and 16related conditions, for the health and caregiving needs of 17military families, or to cope with domestic and sexual 18violence.19    The disparities for access to and the need for leave cut 20across income and other demographics. Higher income workers 21have greater access to paid leave than lower income workers; 22women workers have higher rates of unmet need for leave than 23men; Black, Asian American, Pacific Islander, and Native   HB2946- 2 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1American workers have higher rates of unmet need for leave 2than white workers; and Hispanic workers are less likely than 3non-Hispanic workers to have access to paid leave in the first 4place.5    Moreover, in 73% of all Illinois households with children, 6more than 2,000,000 homes, all parents have paying jobs. 7Illinois mothers are key family breadwinners in 84% of black 8families, 49% of Latinx families, and 48% of white families. 9While women make up half of the workforce, they are 10responsible for the majority of unpaid family household and 11care work, which has a significant impact on their health and 12well-being. Maintaining an attachment to the workforce is 13vital to women's economic stability; an employment gap of just 14one year leads to a 39% decrease in annual earnings, and that 15disparity increases over time. With the demographic shift 16toward an aging population, the need for family caregiving 17continues to grow. In less than 15 years, the share of the 18State's population of individuals aged 65 and over will grow 19by one-third. If any of these women take unpaid leave, her 20whole family, and Illinois, suffers.21    The United States is the only industrialized nation in the 22world that does not have a mandatory workplace-based program 23for such income support. The negative economic impact on 24families and our economy is real. A U.S. Department of Labor 25report indicates if women participated in the labor force at 26the same rate as women in countries with paid leave, our   HB2946- 3 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1economy would benefit from more than $500 billion in 2additional economic activity.3    Providing parents and caregivers with paid leave from work 4to care for their infants and young children is critical to the 5healthy development of children and families. Attentive and 6consistent relationships between very young children and their 7families help children develop the ability to learn, to form 8positive relationships, and to exercise self-control. Without 9paid family and medical leave, most families are forced to 10choose between caring for their children and their economic 11security.12    The majority of Illinois small business owners and 13entrepreneurs support a State-administered paid family and 14medical leave program as it ensures economic security, 15strengthens business recruitment and retention of employees, 16and mitigates the loss of income for small business owners, 17which comprise over 90% of businesses in the United States, 18including the self-employed and businesses with under 10 19employees.20    It is therefore desirable and necessary to develop systems 21that help individuals and families adapt to the competing 22interests of work and home, which not only benefit workers, 23but also benefit employers by reducing employee turnover and 24increasing worker productivity.25    It is the intent of the General Assembly to create a family 26and medical leave program to relieve the serious menace to   HB2946- 4 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1health, morals, and welfare of Illinois families, to increase 2workplace productivity, and to alleviate the enormous and 3growing stress on working families of balancing the demands of 4work and family needs. It is the intent of the General Assembly 5that this Act shall be liberally construed in favor of 6providing workers with the greatest amount of paid family and 7medical leave coverage, benefits, and employment security. 8    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:9    (1) "Average weekly wage" means the amount derived by 10dividing by 12 an employee's total earnings, including wages, 11gratuities, bonuses, commissions, and any other compensation 12that constitutes remuneration, earned during the quarter with 13the highest earnings in the applicable benefit year, or the 14amount derived by dividing by 12 an employee's total earnings, 15including wages, gratuities, bonuses, commissions, and any 16other compensation that constitutes remuneration, to fulfill a 17contract for a covered business entity, earned in the quarter 18with the highest earnings in the applicable benefit year, or 19for individuals not currently employed or under contract, the 20amount derived by dividing by 12 of an individual's total 21earnings, including wages, gratuities, bonuses, commissions, 22and any other compensation that constitutes remuneration, 23earned during the quarter with the highest earnings earned in 24the 4 quarters prior to the last day of employment or end of 25contract.  HB2946- 5 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1    (2) "Benefit year" means the period of 52 consecutive 2weeks beginning on the Sunday immediately preceding the first 3day that family and medical leave under this Act commences for 4the covered individual.5    (3) "Care" includes, but is not limited to, physical or 6psychological care, emotional support, visitation, arranging 7for care or a change in care, assistance with essential daily 8living matters, and personal attendant services.9    (4) "Child" means a biological, adopted, or foster child, 10a stepchild, grandchild, or legal ward, or a child for whom an 11employee stands in loco parentis, a person to whom the 12employee stood in loco parentis when the person was a minor 13child, a child of the spouse of an employee, or a child of a 14party to a civil union or legal guardianship, or any other 15individual whose close association with the employee is the 16equivalent of a child as determined by the employee, 17regardless of age or dependency status.18    (5) "Civil union" means a civil union as defined in the 19Illinois Religious Freedom Protection and Civil Union Act.20    (6) "Consecutive leave" means leave that is taken without 21interruption based upon an employee's regular work schedule or 22contract and does not include breaks in employment in which an 23employee is not regularly scheduled to work. For example, when 24an employee is normally scheduled to work from September 25through June and is not scheduled to work during July and 26August, a leave taken continuously during May, June, and   HB2946- 6 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1September shall be considered a consecutive leave.2    (7) "Contributions" or "premiums" means the payments made 3by an employer, a covered business entity, or a self-employed 4individual to the Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund, as 5required by this Act.6    (8) "Covered business entity" means a business or trade 7that contracts with one or more individuals for services and 8is required to report the payment of services to such 9individuals on IRS Form 1099-MISC or IRS Form 1099-K for more 10than 25% of its Illinois workforce. Such individuals are 11included in the covered business entity's workforce if the 12contracts for services include, but are not limited to, oral 13or written contracts, and services arranged through 14application software designed to run on smartphones and other 15mobile devices and software designed to run inside a web 16browser. Covered business entities and individuals who 17contract for services with covered business entities are 18considered employers or employees where the context dictates.19    (9) "Covered individual" means either:20        (A) an individual who is or has been employed by any 21    combination of employers in the State of Illinois and 22    meets the financial eligibility requirements of subsection 23    (f) of Section 20;24        (B) a self-employed individual who has: (i) elected 25    coverage under Section 25 and (ii) reported earnings to 26    the Illinois Department of Revenue from self-employment   HB2946- 7 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1    that meet the financial eligibility requirements of 2    subsection (f) of Section 20, as if the individual were an 3    employee;4        (C) an individual who contracts for services with a 5    covered business entity;6        (D) a domestic worker; or7        (E) a former employee, self-employed individual, 8    individual who contracts for services with a covered 9    business entity, or a domestic worker, and has:10            (i) met the financial eligibility requirements of 11        subsection (f) of Section 20 at the time of separation 12        from employment or the end of a contract; and13            (ii) been separated from employment or the end of 14        a contract for not more than 52 weeks at the start of 15        the family or medical leave taken by the former 16        employee, self-employed individual, individual who 17        contracts for services with a covered business entity, 18        or is a domestic worker.19    A covered individual is considered to be employed in the 20State of Illinois if: (i) the individual works in Illinois; 21(ii) the individual performs some work in Illinois and the 22employer's base of operations or the place from which the work 23is directed and controlled is in Illinois; or (iii) the base of 24operations or place from which the work is directed or 25controlled is not in any state in which some part of the work 26is performed, but the individual's residence is in this State.  HB2946- 8 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1    (10) "Department" means the Department of Employment 2Security.3    (11) "Director" means the Director of Employment Security 4and any transaction or exercise of authority by the Director 5shall be deemed to be performed by the Department.6    (12) "Domestic or sexual violence" means domestic 7violence, sexual assault, or stalking.8    (13) "Domestic violence" means abuse, as defined in 9Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986, by a 10family or household member, as defined in Section 103 of the 11Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986, or as defined in this 12Act.13    (14) "Domestic worker" has the meaning set forth in 14Section 10 of the Domestic Workers' Bill of Rights. "Domestic 15worker" also includes independent contractors, sole 16proprietors, and partnerships who engage in "domestic work", 17as defined in Section 10 of the Domestic Workers' Bill of 18Rights Act.19    (14) "Employ" means to suffer or permit to work.20    (15) "Employee" means any individual or person who works 21for an employer for wage, remuneration, or other compensation, 22and works any number of hours, whether full-time or part-time 23or on a temporary or contingent basis, and any individual who 24contracts for services with a covered business entity or is a 25domestic worker. Except for individuals or persons that 26contract for services with a covered business entity or   HB2946- 9 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1domestic workers who contract for services, "employee" does 2not include any individual:3        (A) who has been and will continue to be free from 4    control and direction over the performance of the 5    individual's work, both under the individual's contract of 6    service with the individual's employer and in fact; and7        (B) who performs work which is either outside the 8    usual course of business or is performed outside all of 9    the places of business of the employer unless the employer 10    is in the business of contracting with third parties for 11    the placement of employees; and12        (C) who is in an independently established trade, 13    occupation, profession or business.14    (16) "Employer" means any individual, person, partnership, 15association, limited liability company, trust, estate, 16joint-stock company, insurance company, employment and labor 17placement agency, or business where wages are made directly or 18indirectly by the agency or business for work undertaken by 19the employee under hire to a third party pursuant to a contract 20between the agency or business with the third party, or 21corporation, whether domestic or foreign, or the receiver, 22trustee in bankruptcy, trustee, or person that has in its 23employ one or more employees performing services for it. 24"Employer" also includes any employer subject to the 25Unemployment Insurance Act and any business or trade defined 26as a covered business entity in this Act. All employees   HB2946- 10 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1performing services within this State for any employing unit 2that maintains 2 or more separate establishments within this 3State shall be deemed to be employed by a single employing unit 4for all purposes of this Act.5    (17) "Employment benefits" means all benefits provided or 6made available to employees by an employer, including, but not 7limited to, life insurance, health insurance, disability 8insurance, sick leave, annual or vacation leave, paid time 9off, educational benefits, and pensions.10    (18) "Family member" means an employee's child, spouse or 11party to a civil union or legal guardianship, parent, 12grandparent, grandchild, sibling, or any other individual 13related by blood, marriage, or civil union, or whose close 14relationship with the employee is the equivalent of a family 15relationship as determined by the employee.16    (19) "Family and medical leave" means leave taken by a 17covered individual:18        (A) to participate in the providing of care for a 19    family member of the covered individual made necessary by 20    a serious health condition of the family member;21        (B) to be with a child during the first 12 months after 22    the child's birth, the first 12 months after the placement 23    of the child for adoption or foster care, the first 12 24    months after the child becomes a legal ward, or the first 25    12 months after in loco parentis status of the child is 26    acquired;  HB2946- 11 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1        (C) for the covered individual's own serious health 2    condition, including, but not limited to, conditions in 3    connection with pregnancy, recovery from childbirth, 4    related conditions even though the covered individual does 5    not receive treatment from a health care provider during 6    the absence, including, but not limited to, absence due to 7    morning sickness, a physical limitation arising from 8    pregnancy, or exposure to chemicals or hazardous material 9    that may be harmful, or any related condition;10        (D) because of any qualifying exigency arising out of 11    the fact that a family member is on active duty (or has 12    been notified of an impending call or order to active 13    duty) in the Armed Forces of the United States; 14        (E) because the covered individual's or the covered 15    individual's family member is the victim of domestic or 16    sexual violence and the covered individual requests leave 17    because the victim is: (i) experiencing or has experienced 18    an incident of or ongoing domestic or sexual violence; 19    (ii) seeking medical attention for, or recovering from, 20    physical, emotional, or psychological injuries caused by 21    domestic or sexual violence; (iii) obtaining services from 22    a victim services organization; (iv) obtaining 23    psychological or other counseling; (v) participating in 24    safety planning, temporarily or permanently relocating, or 25    taking other actions to increase the safety of the victim 26    or the victim's family members from future domestic or   HB2946- 12 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1    sexual violence to ensure safety or economic security; or 2    (vi) seeking legal assistance or remedies to ensure the 3    health and safety of the victim or the victim's family 4    members, including preparing for or participating in any 5    civil or criminal legal proceeding related to or derived 6    from domestic or sexual violence;7        (F) when a public health emergency or other disaster, 8    as defined in the Disaster Relief Act or Section 11 of the 9    Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act, has been 10    declared by a municipal, State, or federal official, and 11    until 10 weeks following the official termination or 12    suspension of the public health emergency or other 13    disaster, leave under this Act shall be implemented. Such 14    leave shall be provided for any reason related to a public 15    health emergency or other disaster, including, but not 16    limited to:17            (i) the covered individual is subject to an 18        individual or general federal, State, or local 19        quarantine or isolation order related to a public 20        health emergency or other disaster;21            (ii) the covered individual has been advised by a 22        health care provider to self-quarantine, or is 23        otherwise under quarantine, including self-imposed 24        quarantine, due to concerns related to a public health 25        emergency or other disaster;26            (iii) the employee is experiencing symptoms   HB2946- 13 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1        related to a public health emergency or other disaster 2        and is seeking a medical diagnosis;3            (iv) the covered individual is seeking preventive 4        care or other care or treatment related to a public 5        health emergency or other disaster;6            (v) the covered individual is caring for a family 7        member who is subject to an order described in clause 8        (i), has been advised as described in clause (ii), is 9        experiencing symptoms or seeking preventive care as 10        described in clause (iii) or clause (iv), or whose 11        caregiving facility or caregiver is partially or 12        completely unavailable due to precautions related to a 13        public health emergency or other disaster;14            (vi) the covered individual is caring for a child 15        of such covered individual if the school or place of 16        the care of the child has been partially or completely 17        closed, or the child care provider of such child is 18        partially or completely unavailable due to precautions 19        related to a public health emergency or other 20        disaster, including when the school or place of care 21        is (I) is physically closed but providing virtual 22        learning instruction; (II) requires or makes optional 23        virtual learning instruction; or (III) requires or 24        makes available a hybrid of in-person and virtual 25        learning instruction models;26            (vii) the covered individual is experiencing any   HB2946- 14 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1        other substantially similar condition specified by a 2        federal, State, or local government public health or 3        other official;4            (viii) the covered individual's hours of work have 5        been reduced, the covered individual has been 6        furloughed, the covered individual has been terminated 7        from employment, or the covered individual's contract 8        for services has terminated; or9            (ix) the employer is not following the recommended 10        health and safety guidance issued by a federal, State, 11        or local public official related to a public health 12        emergency or other disaster; or 13        (G) To care for a child if the child's school or place 14    of care has been partially or completely closed or if the 15    childcare provider is partially or completely unavailable 16    to provide for the child's well-being.17    "Family and medical leave" does not include any period of 18time during which a covered individual is paid benefits 19pursuant to the Workers' Compensation Act because the covered 20individual is unable to perform the duties of the covered 21individual's employment due to the covered individual's own 22disability or paid benefits pursuant to the Unemployment 23Insurance Act.24    (20) "Family and medical leave benefits" means any 25payments that are payable to an individual for all or part of a 26period of family and medical leave.  HB2946- 15 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1    (21) "Health care provider" means any person licensed 2under federal, State, or local law, or the laws of a foreign 3nation, to provide health care services, any other person who 4has been authorized to provide health care by a licensed 5health care provider, or any other individual determined by 6the Department to be capable of providing health care 7services.8    (22) "Intermittent leave" means a nonconsecutive leave 9consisting of intervals, each of which is at least one day 10within a consecutive 12-month period.11    (23) "Parent" means a biological parent, foster parent, 12adoptive parent, stepparent, or parent-in-law of the covered 13individual or a person who is or was a legal guardian of, or 14who stood in loco parentis to, the covered individual when the 15covered individual was a child, or any other individual whose 16close association with the covered individual is the 17equivalent of a parent as determined by the covered 18individual.19    (24) "Placement for adoption" means the time when a 20covered individual adopts a child or becomes responsible for a 21child pending adoption by the covered individual or the 22covered individual's family member.23    (25) "Qualifying exigency" means a need arising out of a 24covered individual's family member's active duty service or 25notice of an impending call or order to active duty in the 26Armed Forces, including, but not limited to, providing for the   HB2946- 16 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1care or other needs of the military member's family member, 2making financial or legal arrangements for the military 3member, attending counseling, attending military events or 4ceremonies, spending time with the military member during a 5rest and recuperation leave or following return from 6deployment or making arrangements following the death of the 7military member. "Armed Forces" includes the Army, Navy, Air 8Force, Marine Corps, Coast Guard, and National Guard or 9Reserves.10    (26) "Self-employed individual" means a sole proprietor 11that meets the specifications under the definition of the term 12"employee", a member of a limited liability company or limited 13liability partnership, or an individual who resides in 14Illinois and whose net profit or loss from a business is 15required to be reported to the Illinois Department of Revenue.16    (27) "Serious health condition" means an illness, injury, 17impairment, or physical or mental condition that requires 18inpatient care in a hospital, hospice, or residential medical 19care facility or continuing medical treatment, counseling, or 20continuing supervision by a health care provider or victim 21services organization. "Serious health condition" includes, 22but is not limited to, conditions in connection with 23pregnancy, recovery from childbirth, or any related condition.24    (28) "Sexual assault" means any conduct proscribed by: (i) 25Article 11 of the Criminal Code of 2012 except Sections 11-35 26and 11-45; or (ii) Sections 12-13, 12-14, 12-14.1, 12-15, and   HB2946- 17 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b112-16 of the Criminal Code of 2012.2    (29) "Stalking" means any conduct proscribed by the 3Criminal Code of 2012 in Sections 12-7.3, 12-7.4, and 12-7.5.4    (30) "Statewide average weekly wage" means the wage 5determined by the Department of Employment Security pursuant 6to paragraph 2 of subsection B of Section 401 of the 7Unemployment Insurance Act.8    (31) "12-month period" means, with respect to an employee 9who establishes a valid claim for family and medical leave 10benefits during a period of family and medical leave, the 365 11consecutive days that begin with the first day that the 12employee first establishes the claim.13    (32) "Fund" means the Family and Medical Leave Insurance 14Fund established in Section 35.15    (33) "Victim" or "survivor" means an individual who has 16been subjected to domestic or sexual violence.17    (34) "Victim services organization" means a nonprofit, 18nongovernmental organization that provides assistance to 19victims of domestic or sexual violence, including rape crisis 20centers, organizations carrying out a domestic violence 21program, organizations operating a shelter or providing 22counseling services, or a legal services organization or other 23organization providing assistance through the legal process.24    (35) "Wages" means any remuneration owed an individual 25pursuant to employment, an employment contract or agreement 26between 2 or more parties or a contract for services with a   HB2946- 18 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1covered business entity, whether paid directly or indirectly, 2including, but not limited to, salaries, commissions, 3gratuities, and bonuses, and reasonable cash value of board, 4rent, housing, lodging, payment in kind and all remuneration 5paid in any medium other than cash, and whether the amount is 6determined on a time, task, piece, or any other basis of 7calculation.8    (36) "Weekly benefit amount" means the amount of wage 9replacement paid to a covered individual on a weekly basis 10while the covered individual is on family and medical leave, 11as provided in Section 40. 12    Section 15. Family and medical leave insurance program. 13    (a) The Department shall establish and administer a family 14and medical leave insurance program.15    (b) The Department shall establish procedures and forms 16for filing claims for benefits under this Act.17    (c) The Department shall use information sharing and 18integration technology to facilitate the disclosure of 19relevant information or records by the Department.20    (d) Information contained in the files and records 21pertaining to an employee, an individual who contracts for 22services with a covered business entity, a self-employed 23individual, any covered individual under this Act, or a family 24member of such individual is confidential and not open to 25inspection other than by public employees in the performance   HB2946- 19 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1of their official duties. However, the employee, an individual 2who contracts for services with a covered business entity, a 3self-employed individual, a covered individual, or an 4authorized representative of an employee, an individual who 5contracts for services with a covered business entity, 6self-employed individual, or covered individual may review the 7records or receive specific information from the records on 8the presentation of the signed authorization of the employee, 9individual who contracts for services with a covered business 10entity, the self-employed individual, or the covered 11individual. An employer, covered business entity, or the 12employer's or covered business entity's duly authorized 13representative may review the records of an employee employed 14by the employer, individual who contracts for services with a 15covered business entity, or self-employed individual in 16connection with a pending claim, with the exception of any 17protected health information provided to the Department by an 18entity covered by the Health Insurance Portability and 19Accountability Act or information related to a use of leave 20authorized under paragraph (E) of item (19) of Section 10. At 21the Department's discretion, other persons may review records 22when such persons are rendering assistance to the Department 23at any stage of the proceedings on any matter pertaining to the 24administration of this Act. An employer and a covered business 25entity must keep at its place of business for not less than 5 26years from the date of a request for leave records from which   HB2946- 20 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1the information needed by the Department for purposes of this 2Act may be obtained. The records shall at all times be open to 3the inspection of the Department pursuant to rules adopted by 4the Department. An employer or covered business entity subject 5to any provision of this Act shall make and preserve records 6that document the name, address, and occupation of each 7employee, individual who contracts for services with a covered 8business entity, or domestic worker, the wages and any other 9compensation paid, benefits provided, and contract for 10services for each employee, individual with a contract for 11services with a covered business entity, or domestic worker, 12and any other information the Director may by rule deem 13necessary and appropriate for enforcement of this Act. An 14employer or covered business entity subject to any provision 15of this Act shall preserve those records for a period of not 16less than 5 years and shall make reports from the records as 17prescribed by rule or order of the Director, unless the 18records relate to an ongoing investigation or enforcement 19action under this Act, in which case the records must be 20maintained until their destruction is authorized by the 21Department or by court order.22    (e) The Department shall develop and implement an outreach 23program to ensure that individuals who may be eligible to 24receive family and medical leave benefits under this Act are 25made aware of these benefits. Outreach information shall 26explain, in an easy-to-understand format, eligibility   HB2946- 21 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1requirements, the claims process, weekly benefit amounts, 2maximum benefits payable, notice requirements, reinstatement 3and nondiscrimination rights, confidentiality, and 4coordination of leave under this Act and other laws, 5collective bargaining agreements, and employer and covered 6business entity policies. Outreach information shall be 7available in English, Spanish, Polish, Russian, Tagalog, 8Mandarin, and in other languages that are spoken as a primary 9language by a significant portion of the State's population, 10as determined by the Department.11    (f) An employee, individual who contracts for services 12with a covered business entity, or domestic worker may make a 13claim for benefits under this Act on and after January 1 of the 14year one year after the Department begins collecting employer 15and covered business entity premium contributions under this 16Act. 17    Section 20. Eligibility for benefits. 18    (a) The Department may require that a claim for family and 19medical leave benefits under this Act be supported by a 20certification. For a claim for family and medical leave under 21paragraph (A), (B), or (C) of item (19) of Section 10, the 22certification shall be issued by a health care provider of the 23employee's, the individual who contracts for services for a 24covered business entity's, or the covered individual's 25choosing who is providing care to the employee or the   HB2946- 22 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1employee's family member if applicable or the individual who 2contracts for services with a covered business entity or such 3individual's family member if applicable, or covered 4individual or the covered individual's family member, however, 5for a claim under paragraph (C) for leave for conditions in 6connection with pregnancy, recovery after childbirth, or any 7related conditions, leave shall be granted even though the 8covered individual does not receive treatment from a health 9care provider during the absence. For a claim for family and 10medical leave because of a qualifying exigency under paragraph 11(D), documentation shall be sufficient if it includes: (i) a 12copy of the family member's active duty orders; (ii) other 13documentation issued by the Armed Forces; or (iii) other 14documentation permitted by the Department. For a claim for 15family and medical leave under paragraph (E) of item (19) of 16Section 10, any one of the following is acceptable for 17certification, and only one of the following documents shall 18be required: a police report, court document, document issued 19by a healthcare provider, or a signed statement from an 20attorney, a member of the clergy, or a victim services 21organization or advocate. It is up to the employee, individual 22who contracts for services with a covered business entity, or 23covered individual to determine which documentation to submit. 24If documentation has been submitted, the Department or the 25employer or covered business entity shall not request or 26require any other documentation if the reason for the initial   HB2946- 23 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1or subsequent claims for family and medical leave is related 2to the same incident of violence or the same perpetrator of the 3violence. For leave under paragraphs (F) and (G) of item (19) 4of Section 10, a statement signed by the covered individual is 5acceptable documentation for certification.6    (b) The eligibility for benefits of an employee, an 7individual who contracts with a covered business entity, or a 8domestic worker is not affected by a strike or lockout at the 9factory, establishment, or other premises at which the 10employee is or was last employed.11    (c) An employee, individual who contracts for services 12with a covered business entity, or domestic worker who has 13received benefits under this Act may not lose any other 14employment benefits, including seniority or pension rights, 15accrued before the date that family and medical leave 16commenced. The employer or covered business entity shall 17maintain during any period of family and medical leave taken 18the health benefits of the employee and, if applicable, the 19dependents of the employee, the individual who contracts for 20services with a covered business entity, or the domestic 21worker in force at the time a request for family and medical 22leave was made, for the duration of such leave as if the 23employee, individual who contracts for services with a covered 24business entity, or domestic worker had continued to work from 25the date the employee, individual who contracts for services 26with a covered business entity, or domestic worker commenced   HB2946- 24 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1the family and medical leave until the date the employee, 2individual who contracts for services with a covered business 3entity, or domestic worker returns to work. However, this 4Section does not entitle an employee, individual who contracts 5for services with a covered business entity, or domestic 6worker to accrue employment benefits during a period of family 7and medical leave or to a right, benefit, or position of 8employment other than a right, benefit, or position to which 9the employee, individual who contract for services with a 10covered business entity, or domestic worker would have been 11entitled had the employee, individual who contracts for 12services with a covered business entity, or domestic worker 13not taken family and medical leave.14    (d) This Act does not diminish an employer's or covered 15business entity's obligation to comply with a collective 16bargaining agreement or an employment benefits program or plan 17that provides greater benefits to employees, individuals who 18contract for services with a covered business entity, or 19domestic workers than the benefits provided under this Act.20    (e) An agreement by an employee, individual who contracts 21for services with a covered business entity, or domestic 22worker to waive the rights of the employee, individual who 23contracts for services with a covered business entity, or 24domestic worker under this Section is void as contrary to 25public policy. The benefits under this Act may not be 26diminished by a collective bargaining agreement or another   HB2946- 25 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1employment benefits program or plan entered into or renewed 2after the effective date of this Act.3    (f) Subject to the requirements of this Act, an individual 4shall be eligible to receive benefits under this Act if that 5individual has been paid during the individual's base period 6wages equal to not less than $1,600, provided that the 7individual has been paid wages equal to at least $440 during 8that part of the individual's base period which does not 9include the calendar quarter in which the wages paid to the 10individual were highest. "Base period" means the first 4 of 11the last 5 completed calendar quarters immediately preceding 12the Sunday immediately preceding the first day that family and 13medical leave under this Act commences for the covered 14individual. However, if an individual is not eligible to 15receive family and medical leave benefits or an individual's 16weekly benefit amount would be lower using such base period, a 17base period consisting of the last 4 completed quarters 18immediately preceding the Sunday immediately preceding the 19first day that family and medical leave under this Act 20commences shall be used to establish eligibility or a higher 21weekly benefit amount for the covered individual. 22    Section 25. Elective coverage; self-employed. 23    (a) For benefits payable beginning January 1, 2027, any 24self-employed person, including a sole proprietor, independent 25contractor, partner, or joint venturer, who has   HB2946- 26 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1self-employment income for work performed in Illinois in 2accordance with the definition of covered individual under 3item (9) of Section 10 may elect coverage for an initial period 4of not less than 3 years and subsequent periods of not less 5than one year immediately following a period of coverage. 6Those electing coverage under this Act are responsible for 7payment of 100% of all premiums assessed to any employer under 8this Act. The self-employed person must file a notice of 9election in writing with the Department in a manner as 10required by the Department by rule.11    (b) A self-employed person who has elected coverage may 12withdraw from coverage within 30 days after the end of each 13period of coverage, or at such other times as the Department 14may adopt by rule, by filing a notice of withdrawal in writing 15with the Department, such withdrawal to take effect not sooner 16than 30 days after the filing the notice with the Department.17    (c) The Department may cancel elective coverage if the 18self-employed person fails to make required payments or file 19reports. The Department may collect due and unpaid premiums 20and may levy additional premiums for the remainder of the 21period of coverage. The cancellation shall be effective no 22later than 30 days after the date of the notice in writing 23advising the self-employed person of the cancellation.24    (d) Those electing coverage are considered employees or 25employers where the context dictates.26    (e) In this Section, "independent contractor" means an   HB2946- 27 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1individual excluded from employment under the definition of 2"employee" under Section 10. 3    Section 30. Disqualification from benefits. 4    (a) An employee is disqualified from family and medical 5leave benefits under this Act if the employee:6        (1) willfully makes a false statement or 7    misrepresentation regarding a material fact or willfully 8    fails to disclose a material fact to obtain benefits; or9        (2) seeks benefits based on a serious health condition 10    that resulted from the employee's commission of a felony.11    (b) A disqualification for family and medical leave 12benefits is for a period of 2 years and commences on the first 13day of the calendar week in which the employee filed a claim 14for benefits under this Act.15    An employee who is disqualified for benefits is liable to 16the Department for a penalty of 15% of the amount of benefits 17received by the employee in addition to the total amount of 18benefits received. 19    Section 35. Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund. 20    (a) The Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund is created 21as a special fund in the State treasury. Money in the Fund may 22be used for the payment of family and medical leave benefits 23and for the administration of this Act. All interest and other 24earnings that accrue from investment of money in the Fund   HB2946- 28 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1shall be credited to the Fund.2    (b) An employer and a covered business entity shall pay a 3premium contribution in the amount of 0.73% of wages for all 4employees and individuals who contract for services with a 5covered business entity. The Department shall by rule provide 6for the collection of the employer's premium contribution. The 7amount of the employer's premium contribution imposed under 8this Section, less refunds authorized by this Act, and all 9assessments and penalties collected under this Act shall be 10deposited into and credited to the Fund.11    (c) A separate account, to be known as the Family and 12Medical Leave Insurance Administration Account, shall be 13maintained in the Fund. An amount determined by the Department 14sufficient for proper administration, not to exceed 0.05% of 15additional employer and covered business entity premium 16contributions as defined in this Section, shall be collected 17and credited to the Administration Account. The expenses of 18the Department in administering the Fund and its accounts 19shall be charged against the Administration Account. The costs 20of administration of this Act shall be charged to the 21Administration Account.22    (d) A separate account, to be known as the Family and 23Medical Leave Benefits Account, shall be maintained in the 24Fund. The account shall be charged with all benefit payments.25    (e) The Department may adjust rates for the collection of 26premiums pursuant to subsection (b) of this Section. The   HB2946- 29 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1Department shall set rates for premiums in a manner that 2minimizes the volatility of the rates assessed and so that at 3the end of the period for which the rates are effective, the 4cash balance shall be an amount approximating 125% of 12 5months of projected expenditures from the Fund, considering 6the functions and duties of the Department under this Act.7    (f) An employer or covered business entity required to pay 8premium contributions under this Section shall make and file a 9report of amounts due under this Section upon a combined 10report form prescribed by the Department. The report shall be 11filed with the Department at the times and in the manner 12prescribed by the Department.13    (g) If the employer or covered business entity is a 14temporary employment agency that provides employees or 15individuals who contract for services with a covered business 16entity on a temporary basis to its customers, the temporary 17employment agency is considered a joint employer with its 18customers for purposes of this Act.19    (h) When an employer or covered business entity goes out 20of business or sells out, exchanges, or otherwise disposes of 21the business or stock of goods, any premiums payable under 22this Section are immediately due and payable, and the employer 23or covered business entity shall, within 10 days thereafter, 24pay the premiums due. A person who becomes a successor to the 25business is liable for the full amount of the premiums and 26shall withhold from the purchase price a sum sufficient to pay   HB2946- 30 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1any premiums due from the employer until the employer produces 2a receipt from the Department showing payment in full of any 3premiums due or a certificate that no premium is due. If the 4premiums are not paid by the employer or covered business 5entity within 10 days after the date of the sale, exchange, or 6disposal, the successor is liable for the payment of the full 7amount of the premiums. The successor's payment of the 8premiums are, to the extent of the payment, a payment upon the 9purchase price, and if the payment is greater in amount than 10the purchase price, the amount of the difference is a debt due 11the successor from the employer or covered business entity. A 12successor is not liable for any premiums due from the person 13from whom the successor has acquired a business or stock of 14goods if the successor gives written notice to the Department 15of the acquisition and no assessment is issued by the 16Department within one year after receipt of the notice against 17the former operator of the business.18    (i) This Section is inoperative before January 1, 2027. At 19that time, the Department shall begin collecting the amounts 20due under this Section. 21    Section 40. Weekly benefit for family and medical leave. 22    (a) An individual's weekly benefit rate shall be 23determined as follows: if the average weekly wage to the 24employee, individual who contracts for services with a covered 25business entity, or domestic worker is (a) 50% or less of the   HB2946- 31 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1statewide average weekly wage, the weekly benefit for the 2employee, individual with a contract for services with a 3covered business entity, or domestic worker is 90% of the 4average weekly wage of the employee, individual with a 5contract for services with a covered business entity, or 6domestic worker or (b) greater than 50% of the statewide 7average weekly wage, the weekly benefit for the employee, 8individual with a contract for services with a covered 9business entity, or domestic worker is the sum of: (i) 90% of 10the average weekly wage of the employee, individual with a 11contract for services with a covered business entity, or 12domestic worker up to 50% of the statewide average weekly 13wage; and (ii) 50% of the average weekly wage of the employee, 14individual with a contract for services with a covered 15business entity, or domestic worker that is greater than 50% 16of the statewide average weekly wage. The benefit rate shall 17be computed to the next lower multiple of $1 if not already a 18multiple thereof. The amount of benefits for each day of 19family and medical leave for which benefits are payable shall 20be one-seventh of the corresponding weekly benefit amount; 21provided that the total benefits for a fractional part of a 22week shall be computed to the next lower multiple of $1 if not 23already a multiple thereof.24    (b) The maximum weekly benefit for family and medical 25leave that occurs on or after January 1, 2026 shall be $1,200. 26By September 30, 2027, and by each subsequent September 30th,   HB2946- 32 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1the maximum weekly benefit shall be adjusted to 90% of the 2State average weekly wage. The adjusted maximum weekly benefit 3amount takes effect on the following January 1st. 4    (c) With respect to any period of family and medical leave 5taken by a covered individual, family and medical leave 6insurance benefits not in excess of the covered individual's 7maximum benefits shall be payable with respect to the first 8day of family and medical leave taken and each subsequent day 9of family and medical leave during that period of family and 10medical leave. The maximum total benefits payable to any 11covered individual commencing on or after the effective date 12of this Act shall be 26 times the weekly benefit amount for an 13employee, individual with a contract for services with a 14covered business entity, or domestic worker in the applicable 15benefit year, except for individuals taking leave pursuant to 16paragraph (C) of item (19) of Section 10 for conditions in 17connection with pregnancy, recovery from childbirth, or any 18related condition where the maximum total benefits payable to 19any covered individual shall be 52 times the employee's weekly 20benefit amount in the applicable benefit year, provided that 21the maximum amount shall be computed in the next lower 22multiple of $1 if not already a multiple thereof.23    (d) The first payment of benefits must be made to a covered 24individual within 14 calendar days after the claim is filed 25and there is sufficient information to approve at least one 26week of benefits; subsequent payments must be made no later   HB2946- 33 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1than semi-monthly thereafter.2    Nothing in this Act shall be construed to prohibit the 3establishment by an employer or a covered business entity, 4without approval by the Department, of a supplementary plan or 5plans providing for the payment to employees, individuals with 6a contract for services with a covered business entity, or 7domestic workers or to any class or classes of employees, 8individuals with a contract for services with a covered 9business entity, or domestic workers, of benefits in addition 10to the benefits provided by this Act. The rights, duties, and 11responsibilities of all interested parties under the 12supplementary plans shall be unaffected by any provision of 13this Act. 14    Section 45. Family and medical leave; duration. A covered 15individual may take up to 26 weeks of family and medical leave 16within any 12-month period for reasons identified in 17paragraphs (A), (B), (C), (D), and (E) of item (19) of Section 1810. However, a covered individual may take up to an additional 1926 weeks of family and medical leave within any 12-month 20period for which the covered individual is eligible for leave 21under paragraph (C) of item (19) of Section 10 taken in 22connection with pregnancy, recovery from childbirth, or 23related conditions. A covered individual may take family and 24medical leave consecutively or on an intermittent schedule in 25which all of the leave authorized under this Act is not taken   HB2946- 34 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1sequentially. 2    Section 50. Annual reports; contents. 3    (a) The Department shall issue and make available to the 4public, not later than July 1, 2028 and July 1 of each 5subsequent year, annual reports providing data on family and 6medical leave benefits claims including separate data for each 7of the following categories of claims: the employee's, 8individual with a contract for services with a covered 9business entity's, or domestic worker's own serious illness; 10care of newborn children; care of newly adopted and fostered 11children; care of seriously ill family members; because of 12family members on active duty in the Armed Forces; for 13domestic or sexual violence, and for conditions in connection 14with pregnancy, recovering from childbirth, or related 15conditions. The reports shall include, for each category of 16claims, the number of individuals receiving the benefits, the 17amount of benefits paid, the average duration of benefits, and 18the average weekly benefit. The report shall provide data by 19gender, race, ethnicity, income, and any other demographic 20factors determined to be relevant by the Department. The 21reports shall also provide, for all family and medical leave 22benefits, the total costs of benefits and the total cost of 23administration, the portion of benefits for claims during 24family and medical leave, and the total revenues from employer 25or covered business entity premium contributions and   HB2946- 35 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1assessments, where applicable; and other sources.2    (b) The Department may, in its discretion, conduct surveys 3and other research regarding, and include in the annual 4reports descriptions and evaluations of the impact and 5potential future impact of the costs and benefits resulting 6from this Act for:7        (1) employees and their families, including surveys 8    and evaluations of what portion of the total number of 9    employees taking family and medical leave would not have 10    taken leave, or would have taken less leave, without the 11    availability of benefits; what portion of employees return 12    to work after receiving benefits and what portion are not 13    permitted to return to work; and what portion of employees 14    who are eligible for benefits do not claim or receive them 15    and why they do not;16        (2) employers, including benefits such as reduced 17    training and other costs related to reduced turnover of 18    personnel, and increased affordability of family and 19    medical leave through the State, with special attention 20    given to small businesses; and21        (3) the public, including savings caused by any 22    reduction in the number of people receiving public 23    assistance.24    (c) The total amount of any expenses that the Department 25determines are necessary to carry out its duties pursuant to 26this Section shall be charged to the Administration Account of   HB2946- 36 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1the Fund. 2    Section 55. Prohibited acts; enforcement. 3    (a) No employer, employment and labor placement agency, 4employment agency, employee organization, covered business 5entity, or other person shall discharge, expel, or otherwise 6retaliate or discriminate against a person because the person 7has requested family and medical leave, attempted to claim 8family and medical leave benefits, taken family and medical 9leave, filed or communicated to the employer or covered 10business entity an intent to file a claim, a complaint, or an 11appeal, or has testified or is about to testify or has assisted 12in any proceeding, under this Act, at any time.13    (b) Any employer or covered business entity who violates 14subsection (a) shall be liable to the individual employed by 15or contracted for services with such a person who is affected 16by the violation for damages equal to the sum of:17        (1) the amount of:18            (A) any wages, salary, employment benefits, or 19        other compensation denied or lost to such individual 20        by reason of the violation; or21            (B) in a case in which wages, salary, employment 22        benefits, or other compensation have not been denied 23        or lost to the individual, any actual monetary losses 24        sustained by the individual as a direct violation, 25        such as the cost of providing care, up to a sum equal   HB2946- 37 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1        to 60 calendar days of wages or salary for the 2        individual; and3        (2) the interest on the amount described under 4    paragraph (A) of item (1) calculated at the prevailing 5    rate; and6        (3) an additional amount as liquidated damages equal 7    to the sum of the amount described in item (1) and the 8    interest described in item (2), except if a person who has 9    violated subsection (a) proves to the satisfaction of the 10    court that the act or omission was in good faith and that 11    the person had reasonable grounds for believing that the 12    act or omission was not a violation of subsection (a), the 13    court may, in the discretion of the court, reduce the 14    amount of the liability to the amount and interest 15    determined under paragraph (A) or (B) of item (1), 16    respectively. 17    In addition, a court may order such equitable relief as 18may be appropriate, including employment, reinstatement, 19promotion, and reinstatement of a contract for services.20    (c) An action to recover the damages or obtain equitable 21relief subsection (a) may be maintained against any person in 22any court on behalf of:23        (1) the individual; or24        (2) the individual or other individuals similarly 25    situated.26    (d) The court in such an action shall, in addition to any   HB2946- 38 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1judgment awarded to the covered individual, allow reasonable 2attorney's fees, reasonable expert witness fees, and other 3costs of the action to be paid by the defendant.4    (e) The right under subsection (c) to bring an action by or 5on behalf of any individual shall terminate:6        (1) on the filing of a complaint by the Department in 7    an action in which restraint is sought of any further 8    delay in the payment of the amount described in item (1) of 9    subsection (b) to such individual by the person 10    responsible under subsection (a) for the payment; or 11        (2) on the filing of a complaint by the Department in 12    an action under subsection (f) in which a recovery is 13    sought of the damages described in item (1) of subsection 14    (b) owing to an individual by a person liable under 15    subsection (a).16    (f) Action by the Department.17        (1) The Department may bring an action in any court to 18    recover the damages described in item (1) of subsection 19    (b).20        (2) Any sums recovered under item (1) of this 21    subsection shall be held in a special deposit account and 22    shall be paid, on order of the Department, directly to 23    each individual affected. Any such sums not paid to an 24    individual because of inability to do so within a period 25    of 3 years shall be deposited into the Fund.26        (3) An action may be brought under this subsection not   HB2946- 39 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1    later than 3 years after the date of the last event 2    constituting the alleged violation for which the action is 3    brought.4        (4) An action brought by the Department under this 5    subsection shall be considered to be commenced on the date 6    when the complaint is filed.7        (5) The Department may bring an action to restrain 8    violations of subsection (a), including the restraint of 9    any withholding of payment of wages, salary, employment 10    benefits, or other compensation, plus interest, found by 11    the court to be due to the individual, or to award such 12    other equitable relief as may be appropriate, including 13    employment, reinstatement, and promotion.14    (g) A person aggrieved by a decision of the Department 15under this Act may request a hearing. The Department shall 16adopt rules governing hearings and the issuance of final 17orders under this Act in accordance with the Illinois 18Administrative Procedure Act. All final administrative 19decisions of the Department under this Act are subject to 20judicial review under the Administrative Review Law. 21    Section 60. Penalties. 22    (a) A person who makes a false statement or 23representation, knowing it to be false, or knowingly fails to 24disclose a material fact to obtain or increase any family and 25medical leave benefit during a period of family and medical   HB2946- 40 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1leave, either for themselves or for any other person, shall be 2liable for a civil penalty of $250 to be paid to the Fund. Each 3such false statement or representation or failure to disclose 4a material fact shall constitute a separate offense. Upon 5refusal to pay such a civil penalty, the civil penalty shall be 6recovered in a civil action by the Attorney General on behalf 7of the Department in the name of the State of Illinois. If, in 8any case in which liability for the payment of a civil penalty 9has been determined, any person who has received any benefits 10under this Act by reason of the making of such false statements 11or representations or failure to disclose a material fact 12shall not be entitled to any benefits under this Act for any 13leave occurring prior to the time he or she has discharged his 14or her liability to pay the civil penalty.15    (b) A person who willfully violates any provision of this 16Act or any rule adopted under this Act for which a civil 17penalty is neither prescribed by this Act nor provided by any 18other applicable law shall be subject to a civil penalty of 19$500 to be paid to the Fund. Upon the refusal to pay such a 20civil penalty, the civil penalty shall be recovered in a civil 21action by the Attorney General on behalf of the Department in 22the name of the State of Illinois. 23    Section 65. Leave and employment protection. 24    (a) During a period in which an employee, individual who 25contracts for services with a covered business entity, or   HB2946- 41 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1domestic worker receives family and medical leave benefits 2under this Act, the employee, individual who contracts for 3services with a covered business entity, or domestic worker is 4entitled to family and medical leave and, at the established 5ending date of leave, to be restored to a position of 6employment or restoration of the contract for services with 7the employer or covered business entity from whom leave was 8taken as provided under subsection (b).9    (b) Except as provided in subsection (d), an employee, 10individual with a contract for services with a covered 11business entity, or domestic worker who receives family and 12medical leave benefits under this Act for the intended purpose 13of the family and medical leave is entitled, on return from the 14leave:15        (1) to be restored by the employer to the position of 16    employment held by the employee, restored by the covered 17    business entity to the contract for services, or restored 18    to the position of employment or the contract for services 19    for domestic workers when the family and medical leave 20    commenced; or21        (2) to be restored to an equivalent position or 22    contract with equivalent employment benefits, pay, and 23    other terms and conditions of employment or contract at a 24    workplace within the same or a geographically proximate 25    work site (such as one that does not involve a significant 26    increase in commuting time or distance) when the family   HB2946- 42 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1    and medical leave commenced.2    (c) The taking of family and medical leave under this Act 3may not result in the loss of any employment or contract 4benefits accrued before the date on which the family and 5medical leave commenced.6    (d) Nothing in this Section entitles a restored employee, 7individual who contracts for services with a covered business 8entity, or domestic worker to:9        (1) the accrual of any seniority or employment 10    benefits during any period of family and medical leave; or11        (2) any right, benefit, or position of employment 12    other than any right, benefit, or position to which the 13    employee would have been entitled had the employee not 14    taken the family and medical leave.15    (e) Nothing in this Section prohibits an employer from 16requiring an employee, individual who contracts for services 17with a covered business entity, or domestic worker on family 18and medical leave to report periodically, but no more than 19twice every 4 weeks of leave, to the employer, covered 20business entity on the status and intention of the employee, 21individual with a contract for services, or domestic worker to 22return to work. 23    Section 70. Pregnancy; effect of other State law. No 24individual shall suffer any repercussion under any Illinois 25law, rule, or policy for any decisions the covered individual   HB2946- 43 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1is authorized to make under this Act regarding leave related 2to pregnancy, recovery from childbirth, or related conditions. 3    Section 75. Notice to employer or covered business entity. 4If the necessity for family and medical leave for any reason 5under item (19) of Section 10 is foreseeable, the employee, 6individual with a contract for services with a covered 7business entity, or domestic worker shall provide the employer 8or covered business entity with not less than 30 days' notice, 9before the date the leave is to begin, of the intention of the 10employee, individual with a contract for services with a 11covered business entity to take leave, except that if the 12expected date requires leave to begin in less than 30 days, the 13employee, individual with a contract for services with a 14covered business entity, or domestic worker shall provide such 15notice as is practical. 16    Section 80. Employment by same employer or covered 17business entity. The right of an employee, individual who 18contracts for services with a covered business entity, or 19domestic worker to leave under this Act shall not be altered or 20abridged by access to leave of any other employee, individual 21who contracts for services with a covered business entity, or 22domestic worker. 23    Section 85. Coordination of leave. Family and medical   HB2946- 44 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1leave taken under this Act must be taken concurrently with any 2leave taken under the federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 31993, if applicable. 4    Section 90. Notice. Every employer and covered business 5entity covered by this Act shall post and keep posted, in a 6conspicuous place on the premises of the employer or covered 7business entity where notices to employees are customarily 8posted, a notice, to be prepared or approved by the Director of 9Employment Security, summarizing the requirements of this Act 10and information pertaining to the filing of a charge. Every 11employer and covered business entity shall also provide such 12notice to employees, individuals with contracts for services 13with a covered business entity, and domestic workers through 14electronic transmission to the employee, individual with a 15contract for services with the covered business entity, or 16domestic worker. The Director shall furnish copies of 17summaries and rules to the employers and covered business 18entities upon request without charge. Any employer or covered 19business entity that fails to post the required notice or 20transmit such notice may not rely on this Act to claim that the 21employee, individual with a contract for services with a 22covered business entity, or domestic worker failed to inform 23the employer or covered business entity that the employee, 24individual with a contract for services with a covered 25business entity, or domestic worker wanted or was eligible for   HB2946- 45 -LRB104 08291 SPS 18342 b1leave under this Act. 2    Section 95. Rules. The Department may adopt any rules 3necessary to implement this Act. 4    Section 105. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 5severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 6    Section 900. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 7Section 5.1030 as follows: 8    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)9    Sec. 5.1030. The Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund. 10    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 111, 2027.